Missouri, session 2026, HB2459.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 488, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 488.449, to read as follows:
488.449. 1. The circuit and associate circuit judges of the circuit court in Scott
County shall require any party filing a civil case in such court, at the time of filing suit,
to deposit with the circuit clerk a surcharge in the amount of forty-five dollars, in
addition to all other court costs now or hereafter required by law or court rule, and no
summons shall be issued until such surcharge has been paid. This section shall not
apply to proceedings when costs are waived or paid by the state, county, or municipality.
2. Such funds shall be payable to the circuit clerk of Scott County to be credited
to a courthouse construction fund, which shall bear interest, to be used only for the
planning and construction of a new courthouse in Scott County, provided that the
courthouse construction fund may be pledged to directly or indirectly secure bonds to
fund such costs.
3. This section shall expire on August 28, 2046.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.